src/morphology/roots/51.lexc
[WORD_ID=lämmin'|'vaunu][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:lämpimässä{#}vaunussa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=lämmin'|'vaunu][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:lämmin{#}vaunu Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=lämmin'|'vaunu][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:lämmin{#}vaunu Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=lämmin'|'vaunu][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:lämmin{#}vaunu Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=lämmin'|'vaunu][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:lämmin{#}vaunu Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=lämmin'|'vaunu][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:lämmin{#}vaunu Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=lämmin'|'vaunu][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:lämmintä{#}vaunua Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=lämmin'|'vaunu][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:lämpimäksi{#}vaunukse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=lämmin'|'vaunu][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:lämpimäksi{#}vaunuksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:matalitta{#}merittä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:matalilta{#}meriltä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:matalilla{#}merillä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:matalille{#}merille Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:matalista{#}meristä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:matalina{#}merinä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:matalien{#}merien Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:matalissa{#}merissä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:matalat{#}meret Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:matalia{#}meriä Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:mataliksi{#}merikse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:mataliksi{#}meriksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:matalatta{#}merettä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:matalalta{#}mereltä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:matalalla{#}merellä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:matalalle{#}merelle Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:matalasta{#}merestä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:matalana{#}merenä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:matalan{#}meren Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:matalassa{#}meressä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:matala{#}meri Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:matala{#}meri Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:matala{#}meri Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:matala{#}meri Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:matala{#}meri Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:matalaa{#}meriä Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:matalaksi{#}merekse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=matala'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:matalaksi{#}mereksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:mustitta{#}herukoitta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:mustilta{#}herukoilta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:mustilla{#}herukoilla Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:mustille{#}herukoille Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:mustista{#}herukoista Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:mustina{#}herukoina Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:mustien{#}herukkojen Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:mustissa{#}herukoissa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:mustat{#}herukat Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:mustia{#}herukoita Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:mustiksi{#}herukoikse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:mustiksi{#}herukoiksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:mustatta{#}herukatta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:mustalta{#}herukalta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:mustalla{#}herukalla Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:mustalle{#}herukalle Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:mustasta{#}herukasta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:mustana{#}herukkana Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:mustan{#}herukan Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:mustassa{#}herukassa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:musta{#}herukka Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:musta{#}herukka Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:musta{#}herukka Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:musta{#}herukka Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:musta{#}herukka Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:mustaa{#}herukkaa Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:mustaksi{#}herukakse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'herukka][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:mustaksi{#}herukaksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:mustitta{#}leivittä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:mustilta{#}leiviltä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:mustilla{#}leivillä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:mustille{#}leiville Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:mustista{#}leivistä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:mustina{#}leipinä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:mustien{#}leipien Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:mustissa{#}leivissä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:mustat{#}leivät Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:mustia{#}leipiä Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:mustiksi{#}leivikse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:mustiksi{#}leiviksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:mustatta{#}leivättä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:mustalta{#}leivältä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:mustalla{#}leivällä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:mustalle{#}leivälle Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:mustasta{#}leivästä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:mustana{#}leipänä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:mustan{#}leivän Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:mustassa{#}leivässä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:musta{#}leipä Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:musta{#}leipä Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:musta{#}leipä Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:musta{#}leipä Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:musta{#}leipä Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:musta{#}leipä Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:mustaa{#}leipää Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:mustaksi{#}leiväkse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leipä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:mustaksi{#}leiväksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leski][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:mustitta{#}leskittä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leski][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:mustilta{#}leskiltä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leski][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:mustilla{#}leskillä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leski][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:mustille{#}leskille Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leski][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:mustista{#}leskistä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leski][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:mustina{#}leskinä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leski][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:mustien{#}leskien Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leski][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:mustissa{#}leskissä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leski][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:mustat{#}lesket Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leski][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:mustia{#}leskiä Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leski][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:mustiksi{#}leskikse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leski][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:mustiksi{#}leskiksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leski][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:mustatta{#}leskettä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leski][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:mustalta{#}leskeltä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leski][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:mustalla{#}leskellä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leski][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:mustalle{#}leskelle Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leski][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:mustasta{#}leskestä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leski][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:mustana{#}leskenä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leski][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:mustan{#}lesken Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leski][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:mustassa{#}leskessä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leski][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:musta{#}leski Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leski][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:mustaa{#}leskeä Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leski][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:mustaksi{#}leskekse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'leski][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:mustaksi{#}leskeksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'lintu][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:mustitta{#}linnuitta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'lintu][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:mustilta{#}linnuilta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'lintu][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:mustilla{#}linnuilla Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'lintu][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:mustille{#}linnuille Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'lintu][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:mustista{#}linnuista Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'lintu][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:mustina{#}lintuina Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'lintu][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:mustien{#}lintujen Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'lintu][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:mustissa{#}linnuissa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=musta'|'lintu][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:mustat{#}linnut Clitic/Optional ;
